Tennessee, session 114, SB0960.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Each county election commission shall include the following questions on
the November 2026 election ballot to serve as a non-binding, advisory referendum:
Should the State of Tennessee legalize medical marijuana? YES or NO
Should the State of Tennessee decriminalize possession of less than one ounce (1 oz.)
of marijuana? YES or NO
Should the State of Tennessee legalize and regulate commercial sales of recreational
use marijuana? YES or NO
SECTION 2. The secretary of state shall compile the results of the non-binding,
advisory referendum, publish the results on the secretary of state's website, and forward the
results to each member of the general assembly.
SECTION 3. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB0960
002627
- 1 -